Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-198
Restraining order or injunction; when.

(1) In order to obtain compliance with the Weights and Measures Act, the director may apply for a restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person who has violated, is violating, or is threatening to violate the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act. The district court of the county where the violation has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which any violation of the act or the rules and regulations has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur, when notified by the director of such violation or threatened violation, to pursue appropriate proceedings without delay pursuant to this section, section 89-1,101, or both. Before the director reports a violation, an opportunity shall be given to such person to present his or her views to the director except when there exists an endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 16;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 31.